Utah statutes.
62A-11-315.5.   Enforcement of liens arising in another state.

A lien arising in another state shall be accorded full faith and credit in this state, without any additional requirement of judicial notice or hearing prior to the enforcement of the lien, if the office, parent, or state IV-D agency who seeks to enforce the lien complies with Section 62A-11-304.1 or Section 62A-11-312.5.

